Massachusetts, session 194th, H166.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 4(c)(1) of chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “impracticable” the following:
“, nor impose upon a marijuana establishment regulations more restrictive or expensive to
comply with than security regulations applicable to pharmacy registrations, as provided by 247
CMR sec. 6.02(6);”
SECTION 2: Section 12(a)(1) of chapter 94G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “personnel” the following:
“, provided that such security requirements impose upon a marijuana establishment
regulations no more restrictive or expensive to comply with than security regulations applicable
to pharmacy registrations, as provided by 247 CMR sec. 6.02(6);”
of 2

SECTION 3: Section 7 of chapter 94I of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “2017.” the following:
No regulation regarding the medical use of marijuana or security requirements for
Medical Marijuana Treatment Centers shall be more restrictive or expensive to comply with than
any rule or regulation of the Board of Registration in Pharmacy regarding the security
requirements for the operation of a pharmacy, as provided by 247 CMR sec. 6.02(6).
SECTION 4: The Cannabis Control Commission shall review and amend its existing
regulations, including 935 CMR 500.110 et seq. and 935 CMR 501.110 et seq., for compliance
with this legislation no later than one year from its enactment date.
of 2